Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 4
INSURANCE

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 73, C.R.S. 1963. This title was repealed and reenacted in 1971, and this article was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2000, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2000, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 INSURANCE IN GENERAL

PART 2 CONSUMER CREDIT INSURANCE

PART 3 PROPERTY AND LIABILITY INSURANCE